District of Columbia statutes.
25-104

Board authority to grant licenses.

(a)

The Board may issue licenses to persons who meet the requirements set forth in this title.

(b)

All licenses issued under this title, except for a temporary license issued under § 25-115, shall be valid for a term of 3 years and may be renewed upon completion of the procedures set forth in this title and payment of the required fees.

(c)

A license to sell alcoholic beverages in the District can be granted only by the Board upon completion of the application and review process as contained in this title.

(d)

Except as set forth in subchapter II of this chapter, each license or permit shall particularly describe the place where the rights of the license are to be exercised.

(e)

The Board, in issuing licenses, may require that certain conditions be met if it determines that the inclusion of the conditions will be in the best interest of the locality, section, or portion of the District where the licensed establishment is to be located. The Board, in setting the conditions, shall state, in writing, the rationale for the determination.

(f)

Unincorporated associations, other than limited liability companies, shall not be issued a license other than a temporary license.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 324, ch. 4, §§ 10, 13
Aug. 24, 1935, 49 Stat. 900, ch. 756, § 8
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(c)
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1394, Pub. L. 91-535, § 5
Oct. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 2-27, § 2, 24 DCR 3720
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-157, § 2(c), 27 DCR 5117
July 26, 1986, D.C. Law 6-130, § 2, 33 DCR 3405
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217,§ 8, 34 DCR 907
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(d), 41 DCR 1658
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1702(b), 49 DCR 6968
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(a), 51 DCR 6525

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-523.01, § 1-636.02, and § 10-1102.01a.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-104.
1973 Ed., §§ 25-110, 25-114.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-190 rewrote subsec. (f) which had read as follows: “(f) Unincorporated associations shall be not be issued a license.
D.C. Law 15-187, in subsec. (b), substituted “a term of 3 years” for “a term of 2 years”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1702(b) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).